Illinois, session 104th, SB301.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Senior Pharmaceutical Assistance Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (320 ILCS 50/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Senior Pharmaceutical Assistance Act.9(Source: P.A. 92-594, eff. 6-27-02.)